District of Columbia statutes.
16-4001

Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Collaborative Law Act”.

May 9, 2012, D.C. Law 19-125, § 2(b), 59 DCR 1928
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 1 of the Uniform Collaborative Law Act.